test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-subst-2tav-ae_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - poorá:
    poorá+N+Sg+Nom:  poorá
    poorá+N+Sg+Gen:  poorá
    poorá+N+Sg+Acc:  poorá
    poorá+N+Sg+Ill:  poorán
    poorá+N+Sg+Loc:  poorást
    poorá+N+Sg+Com:  pooráin
    poorá+N+Sg+Abe:  pooráttáá
    poorá+N+Ess:  poorán
    poorá+N+Sg+Gen:  poorád
    poorá+N+Pl+Nom:  pooráh
    poorá+N+Pl+Gen:  poorái
    poorá+N+Pl+Acc:  pooráid
    poorá+N+Pl+Ill:  pooráid
    poorá+N+Pl+Loc:  pooráin
    poorá+N+Pl+Com:  pooráiguin
    poorá+N+Pl+Abe:  pooráittáá

  Noun - loová:
    loová+N+Sg+Nom:  loová
    loová+N+Sg+Gen:  loová
    loová+N+Sg+Acc:  loová
    loová+N+Sg+Ill:  loován
    loová+N+Sg+Loc:  loovást
    loová+N+Sg+Com:  loováin
    loová+N+Sg+Abe:  loováttáá
    loová+N+Ess:  loován
    loová+N+Par:  loovád
    loová+N+Pl+Nom:  loováh
    loová+N+Pl+Gen:  loovái
    loová+N+Pl+Acc:  loováid
    loová+N+Pl+Ill:  loováid
    loová+N+Pl+Loc:  loováin
    loová+N+Pl+Com:  loováiguin
    loová+N+Pl+Abe:  loováittáá

  Noun - luvdá:
    luvdá+N+Sg+Nom:  luvdá
    luvdá+N+Sg+Gen:  luuvdá
    luvdá+N+Sg+Acc:  luuvdá
    luvdá+N+Sg+Ill:  luuvdán
    luvdá+N+Sg+Loc:  luuvdást
    luvdá+N+Sg+Com:  luuvdáin
    luvdá+N+Sg+Abe:  luvdáttáá
    luvdá+N+Ess:  luvdán
    luvdá+N+Par:  luvdád
    luvdá+N+Pl+Nom: luuvdáh
    luvdá+N+Pl+Gen: [luuvdái, luvdái]
    luvdá+N+Pl+Acc:  luuvdáid
    luvdá+N+Pl+Ill:  luvdáid
    luvdá+N+Pl+Loc:  luuvdáin
    luvdá+N+Pl+Com:  luvdáiguin
    luvdá+N+Pl+Abe:  luvdáittáá

  Noun - kukká:
    kukká+N+Sg+Nom:  kukká
    kukká+N+Sg+Gen:  kuká
    kukká+N+Sg+Acc:  kuká
    kukká+N+Sg+Ill:  kuukán
    kukká+N+Sg+Loc:  kukkáást
    kukká+N+Sg+Com:  kukkáin
    kukká+N+Sg+Abe:  kukáttáá
    kukká+N+Ess:  kukkán
    kukká+N+Par: kukkád
    kukká+N+Pl+Nom:  kukáh
    kukká+N+Pl+Gen:  kukái
    kukká+N+Pl+Acc:  kukkáid
    kukká+N+Pl+Ill:  kukkáid
    kukká+N+Pl+Loc:  kukáin
    kukká+N+Pl+Com:  kukáiguin
    kukká+N+Pl+Abe:  kukáittáá

  Noun - sukká:
    sukká+N+Sg+Nom:  sukká
    sukká+N+Sg+Gen:  suhá
    sukká+N+Sg+Acc:  suhá
    sukká+N+Sg+Ill:  suukán
    sukká+N+Sg+Loc:  suhháást
    sukká+N+Sg+Com:  suhháin
    sukká+N+Sg+Abe:  suháttáá
    sukká+N+Ess:  sukkán
    sukká+N+Par:  sukkád
    sukká+N+Pl+Nom:  suháh
    sukká+N+Pl+Gen:  suhái
    sukká+N+Pl+Acc:  suhháid
    sukká+N+Pl+Ill:  suhháid
    sukká+N+Pl+Loc:  suháin
    sukká+N+Pl+Com:  suháiguin
    sukká+N+Pl+Abe:  suháittáá

  Noun - juŋkká:
    juŋkká+N+Sg+Nom:  juŋkká
    juŋkká+N+Sg+Gen:  juŋká
    juŋkká+N+Sg+Acc:  juŋká
    juŋkká+N+Sg+Ill:  juuŋkán
    juŋkká+N+Sg+Loc:  juŋkkáást
    juŋkká+N+Sg+Com:  juŋkkáin
    juŋkká+N+Sg+Abe:  juŋkáttáá
    juŋkká+N+Ess:  juŋkkán
    juŋkká+N+Par:  juŋkkád
    juŋkká+N+Pl+Nom:  juŋkáh
    juŋkká+N+Pl+Gen:  juŋkái
    juŋkká+N+Pl+Acc:  juŋkkáid
    juŋkká+N+Pl+Ill:  juŋkkáid
    juŋkká+N+Pl+Loc:  juŋkáin
    juŋkká+N+Pl+Com:  juŋkáiguin
    juŋkká+N+Pl+Abe:  juŋkáittáá

  Noun - rullá:
    rullá+N+Sg+Nom:  rullá
    rullá+N+Sg+Gen:  rulá
    rullá+N+Sg+Gen:  rulá
    rullá+N+Sg+Ill:  ruulán
    rullá+N+Sg+Loc:  rulláást
    rullá+N+Sg+Com:  rulláin
    rullá+N+Sg+Abe:  ruláttáá
    rullá+N+Ess:  rullán
    rullá+N+Par:  rullán
    rullá+N+Pl+Nom:  ruláh
    rullá+N+Pl+Gen:  rulái
    rullá+N+Pl+Acc:  rulláid
    rullá+N+Pl+Ill:  rulláid
    rullá+N+Pl+Loc:  ruláin
    rullá+N+Pl+Com:  ruláiguin
    rullá+N+Pl+Abe:  ruláittáá

  Noun - urná:
    urná+N+Sg+Nom:  urná
    urná+N+Sg+Gen:  urná
    urná+N+Sg+Acc:  urná
    urná+N+Sg+Ill:  uurnán
    urná+N+Sg+Loc:  urnáást
    urná+N+Sg+Com:  urnáin
    urná+N+Sg+Abe:  urnáttáá
    urná+N+Ess:  urnán
    urná+N+Par:  urnán
    urná+N+Pl+Nom:  urnáh
    urná+N+Pl+Gen:  urnái
    urná+N+Pl+Acc:  urnáid
    urná+N+Pl+Ill:  urnáid
    urná+N+Pl+Loc:  urnáin
    urná+N+Pl+Com:  urnáiguin
    urná+N+Pl+Abe:  urnáittáá

  Noun - juná:
    juná+N+Sg+Nom:  juná
    juná+N+Sg+Gen:  juná
    juná+N+Sg+Acc:  juná
    juná+N+Sg+Ill:  junán
    juná+N+Sg+Loc:  junást
    juná+N+Sg+Com:  junáin
    juná+N+Sg+Abe:  junáttáá
    juná+N+Ess:  junán
    juná+N+Ess:  junád
    juná+N+Pl+Nom:  junáh
    juná+N+Pl+Gen:  junái
    juná+N+Pl+Acc:  junáid
    juná+N+Pl+Ill:  junáid
    juná+N+Pl+Loc:  junáin
    juná+N+Pl+Com:  junáiguin
    juná+N+Pl+Abe:  junáittáá

  Noun - tuvvá:
    tuvvá+N+Sg+Nom:  tuvvá
    tuvvá+N+Sg+Gen:  tuvá
    tuvvá+N+Sg+Acc:  tuvá
    tuvvá+N+Sg+Ill:  tuuván
    tuvvá+N+Sg+Loc:  tuvváást
    tuvvá+N+Sg+Com:  tuvváin
    tuvvá+N+Sg+Abe:  tuváttáá
    tuvvá+N+Ess:  tuvván
    tuvvá+N+Par:  tuvvád
    tuvvá+N+Pl+Nom:  tuváh
    tuvvá+N+Pl+Gen:  tuvái
    tuvvá+N+Pl+Acc:  tuvváid
    tuvvá+N+Pl+Ill:  tuvváid
    tuvvá+N+Pl+Loc:  tuvváin
    tuvvá+N+Pl+Com:  tuváiguin
    tuvvá+N+Pl+Abe:  tuváittáá

  Noun - čuhčá:
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Nom:  čuhčá
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Gen:  čuuvčá
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Acc:  čuuvčá
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Ill:  čuuhčán
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Loc:  čuuvčást
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Com:  čuvččáin
    čuhčá+N+Sg+Abe:  čuvčáttáá
    čuhčá+N+Ess:  čuhčán
    čuhčá+N+Par: čuhčád
    čuhčá+N+Pl+Nom:  [čuuvčáh, čuvčáh]
    čuhčá+N+Pl+Gen:  [čuuvčái, čuvčái]
    čuhčá+N+Pl+Acc:  čuuvčáid
    čuhčá+N+Pl+Ill:  čuvččáid
    čuhčá+N+Pl+Loc:  čuuvčáin
    čuhčá+N+Pl+Com:  čuvčáiguin
    čuhčá+N+Pl+Abe:  čuvčáittáá

  Noun - fáddá:
    fáddá+N+Sg+Nom:  fáddá
    fáddá+N+Sg+Gen:  fáádá
    fáddá+N+Sg+Acc:  fáádá
    fáddá+N+Sg+Ill:  fáádán
    fáddá+N+Sg+Loc:  fáádást
    fáddá+N+Sg+Com:  fáddáin
    fáddá+N+Sg+Abe:  fádáttáá
    fáddá+N+Ess:  fáddán
    fáddá+N+Par: fáddád
    fáddá+N+Pl+Nom:  fáádáh
    fáddá+N+Pl+Gen: [fáádái, fádái]
    fáddá+N+Pl+Acc:  fáádáid
    fáddá+N+Pl+Ill:  fáddáid
    fáddá+N+Pl+Loc:  fáádáin
    fáddá+N+Pl+Com:  fádáiguin
    fáddá+N+Pl+Abe:  fádáittáá

  Noun - lággá:
    lággá+N+Sg+Nom:  lággá
    lággá+N+Sg+Gen:  láágá
    lággá+N+Sg+Acc:  láágá
    lággá+N+Sg+Ill:  láágán
    lággá+N+Sg+Loc:  lággáást
    lággá+N+Sg+Com:  lággáin
    lággá+N+Sg+Abe:  lágáttáá
    lággá+N+Ess:  lággán
    lággá+N+Par: lággád
    lággá+N+Pl+Nom:  láágáh
    lággá+N+Pl+Gen:  [láágái, lágái]
    lággá+N+Pl+Acc:  láágáid
    lággá+N+Pl+Ill:  lággáid
    lággá+N+Pl+Loc:  láágáin
    lággá+N+Pl+Com:  lágáiguin
    lággá+N+Pl+Abe:  lágáittáá

  Noun - hágá:
    hágá+N+Sg+Nom:  hágá
    hágá+N+Sg+Gen:  hágá
    hágá+N+Sg+Acc:  hágá
    hágá+N+Sg+Ill:  hágán
    hágá+N+Sg+Loc:  hágást
    hágá+N+Sg+Com:  hágáin
    hágá+N+Sg+Abe:  hágáttáá
    hágá+N+Ess:  hágán
    hágá+N+Par:  hágád
    hágá+N+Pl+Nom:  hágáh
    hágá+N+Pl+Gen:  hágái
    hágá+N+Pl+Acc:  hágáid
    hágá+N+Pl+Ill:  hágáid
    hágá+N+Pl+Loc:  hágáin
    hágá+N+Pl+Com:  hágáiguin
    hágá+N+Pl+Abe:  hágáittáá

  Noun - kámppá:
    kámppá+N+Sg+Nom:  kámppá
    kámppá+N+Sg+Gen:  kámpá
    kámppá+N+Sg+Acc:  kámpá
    kámppá+N+Sg+Ill:  káámpán
    kámppá+N+Sg+Loc:  kámppáást
    kámppá+N+Sg+Com:  kámppáin
    kámppá+N+Sg+Abe:  kámpáttáá
    kámppá+N+Ess:  kámppán
    kámppá+N+Par: kámppád
    kámppá+N+Pl+Nom:  kámpáh
    kámppá+N+Pl+Gen:  kámpái
    kámppá+N+Pl+Acc:  kámppáid
    kámppá+N+Pl+Ill:  kámppáid
    kámppá+N+Pl+Loc:  kámpáin
    kámppá+N+Pl+Com:  kámpáiguin
    kámppá+N+Pl+Abe:  kámpáittáá

  Noun - ráksá:
    ráksá+N+Sg+Nom:  ráksá
    ráksá+N+Sg+Gen:  ráávsá
    ráksá+N+Sg+Acc:  ráávsá
    ráksá+N+Sg+Ill:  rááksán
    ráksá+N+Sg+Loc:  ráávsást
    ráksá+N+Sg+Com:  rávssáin
    ráksá+N+Sg+Abe:  rávsáttáá
    ráksá+N+Ess:  ráksán
    ráksá+N+Par: ráksád
    ráksá+N+Pl+Nom:  ráávsáh
    ráksá+N+Pl+Gen: [ráávsái, rávsái]
    ráksá+N+Pl+Acc:  ráávsáid
    ráksá+N+Pl+Ill:  rávssáid
    ráksá+N+Pl+Loc:  ráávsáin
    ráksá+N+Pl+Com:  rávsáiguin
    ráksá+N+Pl+Abe:  rávsáittáá

  Noun - vársá:
    vársá+N+Sg+Nom:  vársá
    vársá+N+Sg+Gen:  vársá
    vársá+N+Sg+Acc: vársá
    vársá+N+Sg+Ill:  váársán
    vársá+N+Sg+Loc:  vársáást
    vársá+N+Sg+Com:  vársáin
    vársá+N+Sg+Abe:  vársáttáá
    vársá+N+Ess:  vársán
    vársá+N+Par: vársád
    vársá+N+Pl+Nom:  vársáh
    vársá+N+Pl+Gen:  vársái
    vársá+N+Pl+Acc:  vársáid
    vársá+N+Pl+Ill:  vársáid
    vársá+N+Pl+Loc:  vársáin
    vársá+N+Pl+Com:  vársáiguin
    vársá+N+Pl+Abe:  vársáittáá

  Noun - lássá:
    lássá+N+Sg+Nom:  lássá
    lássá+N+Sg+Gen:  láásá
    lássá+N+Sg+Acc:  láásá
    lássá+N+Sg+Ill:  láásán
    lássá+N+Sg+Loc:  láásást
    lássá+N+Sg+Com:  lássáin
    lássá+N+Sg+Abe:  lásáttáá
    lássá+N+Ess:  lássán
    lássá+N+Par: lássád
    lássá+N+Pl+Nom:  láásáh
    lássá+N+Pl+Gen: [láásái, lásái]
    lássá+N+Pl+Acc:  láásáid
    lássá+N+Pl+Ill:  lássáid
    lássá+N+Pl+Loc:  láásáin
    lássá+N+Pl+Com:  lásáiguin
    lássá+N+Pl+Abe:  lásáittáá

  Noun - pálstá:
    pálstá+N+Sg+Nom:  pálstá
    pálstá+N+Sg+Gen:  pálstá
    pálstá+N+Sg+Acc: pálstá
    pálstá+N+Sg+Ill:  páálstán
    pálstá+N+Sg+Loc:  pálstáást
    pálstá+N+Sg+Com:  pálstáin
    pálstá+N+Sg+Abe:  pálstáttáá
    pálstá+N+Ess:  pálstán
    pálstá+NṔar: pálstád
    pálstá+N+Pl+Nom:  pálstáh
    pálstá+N+Pl+Gen:  pálstái
    pálstá+N+Pl+Acc:  pálstáid
    pálstá+N+Pl+Ill:  pálstáid
    pálstá+N+Pl+Loc:  pálstáin
    pálstá+N+Pl+Com:  pálstáiguin
    pálstá+N+Pl+Abe:  pálstáittáá

  Noun - kárttá:
    kárttá+N+Sg+Nom:  kárttá
    kárttá+N+Sg+Gen:  kártá
    kárttá+N+Sg+Acc: kártá
    kárttá+N+Sg+Ill:  káártán
    kárttá+N+Sg+Loc:  kárttáást
    kárttá+N+Sg+Com:  kárttáin
    kárttá+N+Sg+Abe:  kártáttáá
    kárttá+N+Ess:  kárttán
    kárttá+N+Par: kárttád
    kárttá+N+Pl+Nom:  kártáh
    kárttá+N+Pl+Gen:  kártái
    kárttá+N+Pl+Acc:  kártáid
    kárttá+N+Pl+Ill:  kárttáid
    kárttá+N+Pl+Loc:  kártáin
    kárttá+N+Pl+Com:  kártáiguin
    kárttá+N+Pl+Abe:  kártáittáá

  Noun - kuáddá:
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Nom:  kuáddá
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Gen:  kuádá
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Acc: kuádá
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Ill:  kuádán
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Loc:  kuádást
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Com:  kuáddáin
    kuáddá+N+Sg+Abe:  kuádáttáá
    kuáddá+N+Ess:  kuáddán
    kuáddá+N+Par: kuáddád
    kuáddá+N+Pl+Nom:  kuádáh
    kuáddá+N+Pl+Gen: kuádái
    kuáddá+N+Pl+Acc:  kuádáid
    kuáddá+N+Pl+Ill:  kuáddáid
    kuáddá+N+Pl+Loc:  kuádáin
    kuáddá+N+Pl+Com:  kuádáiguin
    kuáddá+N+Pl+Abe:  kuádáittáá

  Noun - puánnjá:
    puánnjá+N+Sg+Nom:  puánnjá
    puánnjá+N+Sg+Gen:  puánjá
    puánnjá+N+Sg+Acc: puánjá
    puánnjá+N+Sg+Ill:  puánján
    puánnjá+N+Sg+Loc:  puánjást
    puánnjá+N+Sg+Com:  puánnjáin
    puánnjá+N+Sg+Abe:  puánjáttáá
    puánnjá+N+Ess:  puánnján
    puánnjá+N+Par: puánnjád
    puánnjá+N+Pl+Nom:  puánjáh
    puánnjá+N+Pl+Gen: puánjái
    puánnjá+N+Pl+Acc:  puánjáid
    puánnjá+N+Pl+Ill:  puánnjáid
    puánnjá+N+Pl+Loc:  puánjáin
    puánnjá+N+Pl+Com:  puánjáiguin
    puánnjá+N+Pl+Abe:  puánjáittáá

  Noun - luákká:
    luákká+N+Sg+Nom:  luákká
    luákká+N+Sg+Gen:  luáhá
    luákká+N+Sg+Acc: luáhá
    luákká+N+Sg+Ill:  luákán
    luákká+N+Sg+Loc:  luáhást
    luákká+N+Sg+Com:  luáhháin
    luákká+N+Sg+Abe:  luáháttáá
    luákká+N+Ess:  luákkán
    luákká+N+Par: luákkád
    luákká+N+Pl+Nom:  luáháh
    luákká+N+Pl+Gen: luáhái
    luákká+N+Pl+Acc:  luáháid
    luákká+N+Pl+Ill:  luáhháid
    luákká+N+Pl+Loc:  luáháin
    luákká+N+Pl+Com:  luáháiguin
    luákká+N+Pl+Abe:  luáháittáá

  Noun - suájá:
    suájá+N+Sg+Nom:  suájá
    suájá+N+Sg+Gen:  suájá
    suájá+N+Sg+Acc: suájá
    suájá+N+Sg+Ill:  suáján
    suájá+N+Sg+Loc:  suájáást
    suájá+N+Sg+Com:  suájáin
    suájá+N+Sg+Abe:  suájáttáá
    suájá+N+Ess:  suáiján
    suájá+N+Par: suáijád
    suájá+N+Pl+Nom:  suájáh
    suájá+N+Pl+Gen:  suájái
    suájá+N+Pl+Acc:  suájáid
    suájá+N+Pl+Ill:  suájáid
    suájá+N+Pl+Loc:  suájáin
    suájá+N+Pl+Com:  suájáiguin
    suájá+N+Pl+Abe:  suájáittáá
